Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.130

Patient information form—Penalty.

(1) The secretary shall develop a form to be used by a person licensed under this chapter to inform the patient of the scope of practice and qualifications of an acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner. All license holders shall bring the form to the attention of the patients in whatever manner the secretary, by rule, provides.

(2) A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2019 c 308 s 8; 2010 c 286 s 8; 2003 c 53 s 121; 1995 c 323 s 11; 1991 c 3 s 13; 1985 c 326 s 13.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 308: See note following RCW 18.06.010.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.